Tennessee, session 114, SB2348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The state board of education, in consultation with the department of
education, shall qualify an advanced degree in media and technology as an advanced
degree that leads to a library information specialist endorsement.
(b) A public school that serves any combination of grades nine through twelve
(9-12):
(1) With a current student enrollment of more than seven hundred fifty
(750) students but less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) students must, at
a minimum, employ a full-time library information specialist with an endorsement
as a library information specialist; and
(2) With a current student enrollment of fewer than seven hundred fifty
(750) students must, at a minimum, employ a part-time library information
specialist with an endorsement as a library information specialist, or designate a
teacher to serve as a library information coordinator. If the library is open during
regular school hours and a library information specialist is not present, then a
teacher or other staff member must be assigned to supervise students in the
library.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2348
012654
- 1 -